North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 4. Officers.

§ 55-8-40.
Officers.

A corporation has the officers described in its bylaws or appointed by the board of directors in accordance with the bylaws.

A duly appointed officer may appoint one or more officers or assistant officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

The secretary or any assistant secretary or any one or more other officers designated by the bylaws or the board of directors shall have the responsibility and authority to maintain and authenticate the records of the corporation.

The same individual may simultaneously hold more than one office in a corporation, but no individual may act in more than one capacity where action of two or more officers is required.

Whenever a specific office is referred to in this Chapter, it shall be deemed to include any individual who, alone or collectively with one or more other individuals, holds or occupies such office.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 15, 16, 17; Rev., ss. 1149, 1150, 1151; C.S., s. 1145; G.S., s. 55-49; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 9; 1973, c. 1217; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1024, s. 12.13.

§ 55-8-41.
Duties of officers.

Each officer has the authority and duties set forth in the bylaws or, to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the authority and duties prescribed by the board of directors or by direction of an officer authorized by the board of directors to prescribe the authority and duties of other officers.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 15, 16, 17; Rev., ss. 1149, 1150, 1151; C.S., s. 1145; G.S., s. 55-49; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 9; 1973, c. 1217; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§ 55-8-42.
Standards of conduct for officers.

An officer with discretionary authority shall discharge his duties under that authority:

In good faith;

With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

In a manner he reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

In discharging his duties an officer is entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the officer reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented; or

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the officer reasonably believes are within their professional or expert competence.

An officer is not entitled to the benefit of subsection (b) if he has actual knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (b) unwarranted.

An officer is not liable for (i) any action taken as an officer, or any failure to take any action, if the officer performed the duties of the officer’s office in compliance with this section or (ii) any failure to offer the corporation the right to have or participate in a business opportunity prior to the pursuit or taking of the opportunity by the officer or other person if the corporation’s articles of incorporation include a provision authorized by G.S. 55-2-02(b)(4) and the procedures and approvals required by the provision, if any, were complied with or obtained prior to the pursuit or taking of the opportunity by the officer or other person.

An officer may be entitled to indemnification against liability and expenses pursuant to Part 5 of Article 8 of this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2018-45, s. 12.

§ 55-8-43.
Resignation and removal of officers.

An officer may resign at any time by communicating his resignation to the corporation. A resignation is effective when it is communicated unless it specifies in writing a later effective time. If a resignation is made effective at a later time and the corporation accepts the future effective time, its board of directors or the appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the effective time if the board of directors or the appointing officer provides that the successor does not take office until the effective time.

An officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by (i) the board of directors, (ii) the appointing officer, unless the bylaws or the board of directors provide otherwise, or (iii) any other officer if authorized by the bylaws or the board of directors.

In this section, “appointing officer” means the officer, including any successor to that officer, who appointed the officer resigning or being removed.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 15, 16, 17; Rev., ss. 1149, 1150, 1151; C.S., s. 1145; G.S., s. 55-49; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 9; 1973, c. 1217; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2005-268, s. 12.

§ 55-8-44.
Contract rights of officers.

The appointment of an officer does not itself create contract rights.

An officer’s removal does not itself affect the officer’s contract rights, if any, with the corporation. An officer’s resignation does not affect the corporation’s contract rights, if any, with the officer.

History.

1901, c. 2, ss. 15, 16, 17; Rev., ss. 1149, 1150, 1151; C.S., s. 1145; G.S., s. 55-49; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1959, c. 1316, s. 9; 1973, c. 1217; 1989, c. 265, s. 1.

§§ 55-8-45 through 55-8-49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.